Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB492.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8041 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed:[Section 8041. Regulation of rodeos or rodeo-related events.(a) Prior regulation.--Any ordinance, rule or regulation adopted by a municipality before the effective date of this subsection that regulates the use of any practice, technique or device necessary for the purposes of holding a ticketed, public rodeo or rodeo-related event shall permit a rodeo hosting entity to conduct a rodeo or rodeo-related event on up to 12 days per calendar year. The rodeo hosting entity shall have sole discretion to select the 12 days per calendar year on which to hold a rodeo or rodeo-related event during which the ordinance, rule or regulation specified in this subsection shall not apply.(b) Continuing regulation.--Any ordinance, rule or regulation adopted by a municipality on or after the effective date of this subsection that regulates the use of any practice, technique or device necessary for the purposes of holding a ticketed, public rodeo or rodeo-related event shall permit a rodeo hosting entity to conduct a rodeo or rodeo-related event on up to 12 days per calendar year. The rodeo hosting entity shall have sole discretion to select the 12 days per calendar year on which to hold a rodeo or rodeo-related event, during which the ordinance, rule or regulation specified in this subsection shall not apply.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250HB0492PN0481 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule charter, original charter, optional plan municipality or any similar purpose unit of government that may be created by the General Assembly."Rodeo hosting entity." An entity that:(1) is a nationally recognized professional entity that produces or operates rodeo or rodeo-related events in at least 10 states annually; and(2) produces or operates a ticketed, public rodeo or rodeo-related event in a venue with a capacity of no less than 2,500 seats.]Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0492PN0481 - 3 - 12345678910111213